District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.01

Findings and declaration of intent.

The Council finds that:

(1)

Affordability is critical in providing access to prescription drugs for District of Columbia residents.

(2)

AccessRx enables the District to take steps to make prescription drugs more affordable for qualified District residents, thereby increasing the overall health of District residents, promoting healthy communities, and protecting the public health and welfare.

(3)

AccessRx can be integrated with any District-wide program for the uninsured.

(4)

The intent of AccessRx is not to discourage employers from offering or paying for prescription drug benefits for their employees or to replace employer-sponsored prescription drug benefit plans that provide benefits comparable to those made available to qualified District residents under AccessRx.

History

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 101, 51 DCR 3688

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-503.03.